Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2962
Compensation of directors.

Unless the articles of organization or bylaws otherwise provide, the board of directors may fix the remuneration of directors and nondirector committee members.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 62.